Indiana, session 2026, SB235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-13-2-82.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 82.7. "Intelligent speed assistance device" means an
aftermarket device installed in a motor vehicle that uses technology
to limit the speed of the motor vehicle to not more than the speed
limit of the area within which the vehicle is traveling.
SECTION 2. IC 9-13-2-196, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2020,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 196. (a) "Vehicle" means, except as otherwise
provided in this section, a device in, upon, or by which a person or
property is, or may be, transported or drawn upon a highway. The term
does not include the following:
(1) A device moved by human power.
(2) A device that runs only on rails or tracks.
(3) A wheelchair.
(4) An electric foot scooter.
(b) For purposes of IC 9-17, the term includes the following:
2026 IN 235—LS 6568/DI 149


(1) Off-road vehicles.
(2) Manufactured homes or mobile homes that are:
(A) personal property not held for resale; and
(B) not attached to real estate by a permanent foundation.
(3) Watercraft.
(c) For purposes of IC 9-22 (except IC 9-22-6) and IC 9-32, the term
refers to a vehicle or watercraft of a type that must be registered under
IC 9-18-2 (before its expiration) or IC 9-18.1, other than an off-road
vehicle or a snowmobile under IC 9-18-2.5 (before its expiration) or
IC 9-18.1-14.
(d) For purposes of IC 9-30-5, IC 9-30-6, IC 9-30-8, and IC 9-30-9,
and IC 9-30-17, the term means a device for transportation by land or
air. The term does not include an electric personal assistive mobility
device.
SECTION 3. IC 9-30-13-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A court may require a person who has been
convicted of a crime for which the operation of a motor vehicle is
an element of the offense to use an intelligent speed assistance
device under IC 9-30-17.
(b) A court may require a person to use an intelligent speed
assistance device under this section as a condition of specialized
driving privileges under IC 9-30-16 or as a condition of probation.
(c) A court may order that an intelligent speed assistance device
is installed in any vehicle that:
(1) is owned by the person subject to the court order; or
(2) the person subject to the court order intends to operate.
(d) The person who is subject to the court order under this
section shall pay all costs associated with the intelligent speed
assistance device, as described in IC 9-30-17-6(b), unless the court
determines that the person is indigent.
(e) A court must notify the bureau if an order is issued under
this section.
SECTION 4. IC 9-30-13-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 11. If the bureau receives an order that an intelligent
speed assistance device has been required under section 10 of this
chapter or IC 35-33-8-13, the bureau shall immediately:
(1) mail a notice to the person's address contained in the
records of the bureau; or
(2) send an electronic notice if the person has indicated a
preference for receiving notices from the bureau
2026 IN 235—LS 6568/DI 149


electronically;
stating that the person may not operate a motor vehicle unless the
motor vehicle is equipped with an intelligent speed assistance
device under IC 9-30-17.
SECTION 5. IC 9-30-13-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally
tampers with an intelligent speed assistance device for the purpose
of:
(1) circumventing the intelligent speed assistance device; or
(2) rendering the intelligent speed assistance device inaccurate
or inoperative;
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) A person who has been ordered under section 10 of this
chapter or IC 35-33-8-13 to operate a vehicle with an intelligent
speed assistance device that solicits another person to tamper with
the intelligent speed assistance device for the purpose of:
(1) circumventing the intelligent speed assistance device; or
(2) rendering the intelligent speed assistance device inaccurate
or inoperative;
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 6. IC 9-30-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 17. Intelligent Speed Assistance Devices
Sec. 1. If a court orders the installation of an intelligent speed
assistance device in a motor vehicle under IC 9-30-13-10 or
IC 35-33-8-13, the court shall set the time that the installation must
remain in effect. The term may not exceed the maximum term of
imprisonment the court could have imposed.
Sec. 2. If a court orders a person under IC 9-30-13-10 or
IC 35-33-8-13 to operate only a vehicle that is equipped with an
intelligent speed assistance device, the bureau shall include that
condition when issuing or reinstating a license.
Sec. 3. An intelligent speed limiting device shall utilize GPS
technology to determine the speed limit of each area within which
a vehicle equipped with an intelligent speed limiting device is
traveling. The technology shall allow for reasonable accelerations
above the speed limit, if necessary, for safety reasons based upon
traffic conditions.
Sec. 4. (a) The commissioner may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement this chapter.
2026 IN 235—LS 6568/DI 149


(b) A vendor or provider may submit an application for
approval of an intelligent speed assistance device in a form
prescribed by the bureau.
(c) If testing is required to determine whether an intelligent
speed assistance device complies with standards set forth by the
bureau, the testing must be performed by an independent entity
designated by the bureau. The vendor shall pay any testing
expenses under this section.
(d) If the commissioner finds that the intelligent speed assistance
device complies with the standards of the bureau, the
commissioner may approve the use of the intelligent speed
assistance device.
(e) The bureau shall, not later than November 1 of each year,
provide a report to the legislative council in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 containing the following:
(1) The number of intelligent speed assistance devices
approved by the bureau.
(2) The number of intelligent speed assistance devices
currently installed in Indiana.
(3) The number of intelligent speed assistance devices rejected
by the bureau.
(f) The criminal justice institute may:
(1) evaluate reports submitted by the bureau;
(2) evaluate and study speed limiting issues; and
(3) make recommendations to the bureau.
The bureau shall consider any recommendations made by the
criminal justice institute.
Sec. 5. The maintenance of an intelligent speed assistance device
is the responsibility of the manufacturer.
Sec. 6. (a) A vendor or provider whose intelligent speed
assistance device is approved under section 4 of this chapter shall
provide a report to the court that ordered the device or the court's
designee within one (1) week if either of the following occur:
(1) The date and time of any incident wherein the speed
assistance device has been improperly removed, tampered
with, or rendered inoperative.
(2) Failure of the person ordered to use an intelligent speed
assistance device to appear at the designated device vendor or
provider for maintenance, repair, monitoring, inspection, or
replacement of the intelligent speed assistance device.
(b) Unless the court has determined the person is indigent, the
person subject to a court order requiring the use of an intelligent
2026 IN 235—LS 6568/DI 149


speed assistance device shall pay for the installation, leasing,
maintenance, and removal of the intelligent speed assistance
device, as well as any additional expenses ordered by the court or
the court's designee.
(c) An approved vendor or provider of intelligent speed
assistance device shall provide any reports or data requested by the
bureau.
SECTION 7. IC 35-33-8-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) As a condition of bail, a court may require a
person who has been charged with a crime for which the operation
of a motor vehicle is an element of the offense to use an intelligent
speed assistance device under IC 9-30-17.
(b) A court may order as a condition of bail that an intelligent
speed assistance device is installed in any vehicle that:
(1) is owned by the person subject to the court order; or
(2) the person subject to the court order intends to operate.
(c) The person who is subject to bail conditions under this
section shall pay all costs associated with the intelligent speed
assistance device, as described in IC 9-30-17-6(b), unless the court
determines that the person is indigent.
(d) A court must notify the bureau if a bail order is issued under
this section requiring the use of an intelligent speed assistance
device.
SECTION 8. IC 35-52-9.1-61.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec 61.5. IC 9-30-13-12 defines crimes
concerning the tampering of an intelligent speed assistance device.
2026 IN 235—LS 6568/DI 149